Missouri, session 2026, HB2495.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 290.400, 290.410, 290.420, 290.430, 290.440, 290.450, and
290.460, RSMo, are repealed and six new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 290.400, 290.410, 290.420, 290.430, 290.440, and 290.460, to read as follows:
290.400. 1. As used in sections 290.400 to [290.450] 290.460 the following words
have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Commission", the labor and industrial relations commission of Missouri;
(2) "Employee", every woman or man in receipt of or entitled to compensation for
labor performed for any employer;
(3) "Employer", every person, firm, corporation, agent, manager, representative,
contractor, subcontractor, principal or other person having control or direction of any woman
or man employed at any labor, or responsible directly or indirectly for the wages of another;
(4) ["Female", a woman of eighteen years or over;
(5)] "Wage rates" or "wages", [any compensation for labor measured by time, piece,
or otherwise] all compensation in any form that an employer provides to an employee in
payment for work done or services rendered including, but not limited to, base pay,
overtime bonuses, stock options, awards, tips, or various forms of nonmonetary
compensation if provided in lieu of or in addition to monetary compensation, provided
that such compensation has economic value to the employee.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2495 2
2. Nothing in sections 290.400 to 290.460 shall prevent an employee from
exercising his or her rights under any other provision of law.
290.410. 1. Notwithstanding any other provisions of the law, no employer shall [pay
any female in his employ at wage rates less than the wage rates paid to male employees in the
same establishment for the same quantity and quality of the same classification of work,
provided that nothing herein shall prohibit a variation of rates of pay for male and female
employees engaged in the same classification of work based upon a difference in seniority,
length of service, ability, skill, difference in duties or services performed, difference in the
shift or time of day worked, hours of work, or restrictions or prohibitions on lifting or moving
objects in excess of specified weight, or other reasonable differentiation, or factors other than
sex, when exercised in good faith] discriminate based on gender in providing
compensation for equal work, the performance of which requires equal skill, effort,
and responsibility, and which is performed under similar working conditions.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, it shall not be
unlawful for an employer to pay different wage rates to employees if such payments are
made pursuant to:
(1) A bona fide seniority or merit system;
(2) A system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production;
(3) Any bona fide factor other than gender, provided that wage differentials
based on varying market rates for equal jobs shall not be considered differentials based
on bona fide factors other than gender; or
(4) Bona fide regional economic differentials.
3. An employer who is paying wages in violation of this section shall not reduce
the wage of any employee in order to comply with this section.
4. No employer shall discharge, take any adverse action, or otherwise retaliate in
any manner against any employee because such employee has:
(1) Opposed any act or practice made unlawful by this section; or
(2) Testified, assisted, or participated in any manner in an investigation, hearing,
or other proceeding to enforce this section.
5. No employer shall discharge, take any adverse action, or otherwise retaliate in
any manner against, coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with any employee
because such employee either inquired about, compared, or otherwise discussed the
employee's wages or the wages of another employee; or exercised, enjoyed, aided, or
encouraged any other employee to exercise or enjoy any right granted or protected by
this section.

HB 2495 3
290.420. Any affected [female] employee may register with the commission a
complaint that the wages paid to [her] the employee are less than the wages to which [she]
the employee is entitled under sections 290.400 to [290.450] 290.460.
290.430. The commission shall take all proceedings necessary to mediate the dispute
concerning the payment of any sums alleged to be due and unpaid to the [female] employees.
The commission shall have the power to issue such regulations not inconsistent with the
purpose and provisions of sections 290.400 to [290.450] 290.460, as it deems necessary or
appropriate for the administration thereof.
290.440. 1. Any employer who violates section 290.410 is liable to the [female]
employee affected in the amount of the wages of which the [female] employee is deprived by
reason of the violation and an additional amount in compensatory damages, such
additional amount not to exceed twice the wages awarded.
2. [Any female employee receiving less than the wage to which she is entitled under
sections 290.400 to 290.450 may recover in a civil action the balance of the wages, together
with the costs of suit, notwithstanding any agreement to work for a lesser wage] Any
employer who violates subsection 4 or 5 of section 290.410 is liable to any individual
affected in the amount of all wages and benefits lost as a result of the violation and, if
awarded, an additional amount of compensatory damages in an amount to be
determined by a judge or jury trial.
3. [The burden of proof shall be upon the person bringing the claim to establish that
the differentiation in rate of pay is based upon the factor of sex and not upon other differences
or factors] In the event of a finding that an employer has violated section 290.410, a court
may enjoin such employer from future violations of section 290.410 and may order the
employer to take such additional steps as are necessary including, but not limited to,
reclassification of affected workers to ensure an end to the employer's gender-based pay
practices, or if the employer has engaged in unlawful retaliation prohibited by section
290.410, the court may order such relief as to make the employee whole, including
reinstatement.
4. Any employee prevailing in a civil action brought under sections 290.400 to
290.460, in addition to the remedies set forth in this section, may also recover court costs
and reasonable attorney's fees, notwithstanding any agreement to work for a lesser
wage. Any action brought under sections 290.400 to 290.460 shall be commenced within
two years after the alleged violation occurs or the date of the reasonable discovery of
such violation.
5. If an employee can show a deliberate pattern of violations of the provisions of
sections 290.400 to 290.460, the court may order the employer to pay punitive damages
to the employee in addition to any other compensation or injunctive relief ordered.

HB 2495 4
290.460. The commission shall carry on a continuing program of education,
information, study, and community organization concerning the problems of [female]
employees in seeking, obtaining and holding employment without discrimination on account
of sex. The commission's power and duties shall include but not be limited to the following:
(1) Promote in cooperation with the federal government, state, local and private
agencies and organizations, programs to eliminate discrimination in employment based solely
on sex;
(2) Promote research with the view to reducing barriers based solely on sex in the
hire, employment and retention of [female] employees;
(3) Sponsor and correlate in communities of the state, information and educational
programs intended to reduce or abolish discrimination in employment based solely on sex;
(4) Recommend to the governor, from time to time, any specific proposals for
legislation as may be deemed necessary and proper for the elimination in employment of
discrimination based solely on sex.
[290.450. Any action based upon or arising under sections 290.400 to
290.450 shall be instituted in the circuit court within six months after the date
of the alleged violation, but in no event shall any employer be liable for any
pay due under sections 290.400 to 290.450 for more than thirty days prior to
receipt by the employer of written notice of claim thereof from the female
employee.]
✔